Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for reimbursement of county attorney offices for the cost of attending anti-human trafficking training. The reimbursements must be proportioned equally among all participating Minnesota county attorney offices. new text end